Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 7 Interstate Banking, Interstate Branching and Bank Holding Company Mergers and Acquisitions

19-7-1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term or terms:

“Bank”, “bank-holding company”, “company”, “subsidiary”, and “control” have the meanings set forth in the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, 12 U.S.C. § 1841 et seq., except that “bank” shall also include financial institutions, as defined in this title, and other forms of federally-insured-deposit-taking institutions. Bank-holding companies shall include thrift-holding companies as set forth in the Home Owners’ Loan Act, 12 U.S.C. § 1461 et seq., whether organized with or without capital stock.

“Out-of-state bank” means a bank whose principal office is located in any other state.

“Out-of-state bank-holding company” means a holding company for which the operations of its bank subsidiaries are principally conducted in any other state.

“Rhode Island bank-holding company” means a bank-holding company that controls a financial institution, provided that an out-of-state bank or bank-holding company that acquired control of one or more financial institutions shall not be deemed to be a Rhode Island bank-holding company, unless operations of its bank subsidiaries are principally conducted in this state.

For the purposes of this chapter, the state in which operations of a bank-holding company’s bank subsidiaries are principally conducted is the state in which total deposits of all of its bank subsidiaries are the largest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 45; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 22.

19-7-2.
Acquisitions authorized.

An out-of-state bank or bank-holding company may acquire direct or indirect ownership or control of more than five percent (5%) of the voting stock of one or more financial institutions or Rhode Island bank-holding companies if the following conditions are met:

The laws of the state in which the out-of-state bank is located, or in which operations of the bank subsidiaries of an out-of-state bank-holding company are principally conducted, expressly authorize, under conditions no more restrictive than those imposed by the laws of Rhode Island, as determined by the director, or the director’s designee, the acquisition by a Rhode Island bank-holding company or a financial institution of direct or indirect ownership or control of more than five percent (5%) of the voting stock of banks located in that state or bank-holding companies, the operations of the bank subsidiaries of which are principally conducted in that state;

The acquisition, including all of the terms and conditions of the acquisition, has been approved in advance by the director, or the director’s designee, as being in the public interest, pursuant to a written order evidencing such approval. In determining whether the approval of a proposed acquisition by an out-of-state bank or bank-holding company is in the public interest, the director, or the director’s designee, shall consider, in addition to any other factors he or she may in his or her discretion determine, whether the acquisition shall promote the safety and soundness of the financial institution whose voting stock is to be acquired and the convenience and advantage of communities served by that financial institution, and whether the acquisition is likely to have a significant impact upon the state’s economy, employment levels, and tax base. Any financial institution or Rhode Island bank-holding company that is the subject of an acquisition under this section shall be a party to the proceedings of the director, or the director’s designee, and shall be entitled to seek judicial review of any final decision of the director, or the director’s designee. The procedures for notice and the conducting of hearings by the director, or the director’s designee, and the rights of appeal from decisions of the director, or the director’s designee, shall be governed by this title.

The provisions of subsection (a) shall apply to mergers, acquisitions, consolidations, or purchases of assets and assumptions of liabilities irrespective of whether the transactions under those sections involve an out-of-state bank or out-of-state bank-holding company.

The provisions of this section shall only apply after September 29, 1995, to the extent consistent with and not preempted by federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 45; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 6.

19-7-3.
Interstate mergers of stock financial institutions.

Any financial institution organized with capital stock may, subject to the approval of the director, or the director’s designee, merge or consolidate with one or more banks:

Each of which is organized with capital stock and is either a financial institution or an out-of-state bank; and

At least one of which is an out-of-state bank, pursuant to a plan of merger or consolidation complying with the provisions of this section; provided, however, that the following conditions shall apply prior to June 1, 1997, to the extent consistent with, and not preempted by, federal laws:

The law of the state in which each of these out-of-state banks has its principal office permits this type of merger or consolidation; and

The law of the state in which each of these out-of-state banks has its principal office authorizes, under conditions not substantially more restrictive than those imposed by the laws of this state, as determined by the director, or the director’s designee, a financial institution organized with capital stock to be the successor bank of the merger or consolidation.

The plan of merger or consolidation shall conform to the provisions of §

7-1.2-1001

and to any other requirements that may be imposed by the laws applicable to each bank not organized under the laws of this state.

The plan of merger or consolidation shall require approval as follows:

With respect to each financial institution, by the board of directors and shareholder of that financial institution pursuant to the applicable provisions of §§

7-1.2-1001

—

7-1.2-1002

, except that a plan of merger or consolidation must receive the affirmative vote of the holders of two thirds (2/3) or more of the shares entitled to vote thereon; and

With respect to each bank not organized under the laws of this state, in accordance with the applicable provisions imposed by the laws under which it is organized. Thereafter, articles of merger or consolidation complying with the applicable provisions of §

7-1.2-1003

and the applicable provisions of the laws under which each bank not organized under the laws of this state is organized shall be executed in accordance with the applicable provisions and presented to the director, or the director’s designee, for approval, by filing three (3) originals with the director, or the director’s designee.

Upon receipt of the articles of merger or consolidation, the director, or the director’s designee, shall furnish the applicant a form of notice specifying the names of the constituent banks and assigning a date and place for public hearing on the plan of merger or consolidation. The applicant shall publish the notice at least once a week, for three (3) successive weeks, in one or more newspapers designated by the director, or the director’s designee. Upon a finding that the public interest so requires, the director, or the director’s designee, may lessen the period and the manner prescribed for giving notice. In determining whether to approve a proposed merger or consolidation, the director, or the director’s designee, shall consider whether the merger or consolidation is consistent with the safety and soundness of, and the needs and convenience of the communities served by, each financial institution. The procedures for conducting hearings by the director, or the director’s designee, and the rights of appeal from decisions of the director, or the director’s designee, shall be governed by the applicable provisions of this title.

If the director, or the director’s designee, approves the merger or consolidation in accordance with subsection (d), he or she shall endorse approval upon each original of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation and shall deliver the articles to the applicant. One original of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation bearing the approval in writing shall be filed with the director, or the director’s designee, and two (2) originals shall be filed with the secretary of state, who shall, upon payment to the director, or the director’s designee, of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), issue a certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation pursuant to the provisions of §

7-1.2-1003

. Upon the issuance of the certificate or upon a later date, not more than thirty (30) days after the filing with the secretary of state of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation, that may be set forth in the plan, the merger or consolidation shall be effected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter with the effects set forth therein. At any time prior to the filing of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation with the secretary of state, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned pursuant to the provisions therefor, if any, set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

Any shareholder of a financial institution that is a party to a plan of merger or consolidation under this section shall have the right to dissent from the corporate action involved in accordance with the provisions of §

7-1.2-1201

and on the terms and conditions set forth in §

7-1.2-1202

.

If the successor institution of a merger or consolidation under this chapter is to be organized under laws other than the laws of this state, it shall file the following with the director, or the director’s designee, contemporaneously with the application for approval of the merger or consolidation:

An agreement that it may be served with process in this state in any proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation arising out of its business transacted in this state and any obligation of any of its predecessor financial institutions, including the enforcement of the rights of a dissenting shareholder of any predecessor financial institution;

An irrevocable appointment of the director as its agent to accept service of process in any proceeding in the courts of this state or the courts of the United States situated in this state; and

An agreement that it will promptly pay to the dissenting shareholder of any predecessor financial institution the amount, if any, to which they shall be entitled.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 45; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 17; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 17.

19-7-4.
Interstate mergers of mutual financial institutions.

Any financial institution organized without capital stock may, subject to the approval of the director, or the director’s designee, merge or consolidate with one or more institutions, if:

Each institution is organized without capital stock and is either a financial institution or an out-of-state bank; and

At least one institution is an out-of-state bank, pursuant to a plan of merger or consolidation complying with the provisions of this section; provided, however, the following conditions shall apply prior to June 1, 1997, to the extent consistent with, and not preempted by, federal law:

That the law of the state in which each these out-of-state banks has its principal office expressly permits this type of merger or consolidation; and

The law of the state in which each of these out-of-state banks has its principal office expressly authorizes, under conditions not substantially more restrictive than those imposed by the laws of this state, as determined by the director, or the director’s designee, a financial institution organized without capital stock under the laws of this state to be the successor bank of this merger or consolidation.

The plan of merger or consolidation shall conform to the relevant provisions of §

7-1.2-1001

and to the other requirements that may be imposed by the laws applicable to each bank not organized under the laws of this state.

The plan of merger or consolidation shall require approval as follows:

With respect to a mutual savings bank, by a two thirds (2/3) vote of the board of trustees and majority vote of the depositors of the mutual savings bank present in person or by proxy, at a meeting called by the board of trustees; and

With respect to each bank not organized under the laws of this state, in accordance with the applicable provisions imposed by the laws under which it is organized. Thereafter, articles of merger or articles of consolidation complying with the applicable provisions of §

7-1.2-1003

and the applicable provisions of the laws under which each bank not organized under the laws of this state is organized shall be executed in accordance with these provisions and presented to the director, or the director’s designee, for approval by filing three (3) originals with the director, or the director’s designee.

Upon receipt of the articles of merger or consolidation, the director, or the director’s designee, shall furnish the applicant a form of notice specifying the names of the constituent banks and assigning a date and place for public hearing on the plan of merger or consolidation. The applicant shall publish the notice at least once a week, for three (3) successive weeks, in one or more newspapers designated by the director, or the director’s designee. Upon a finding that the public interest so requires, the director, or the director’s designee, may lessen the period and the manner prescribed for giving notice. In determining whether to approve a proposed merger or consolidation, the director, or the director’s designee, shall consider whether the merger or consolidation is consistent with the safety and soundness of, and the convenience and advantage of the communities served by, each of these institutions. The procedures for conducting hearings by the director, or the director’s designee, and the rights of appeal from decisions of the director, or the director’s designee, shall be governed by the applicable provisions of this title.

If the director, or the director’s designee, approves the merger or consolidation in accordance with subsection (d), he or she shall endorse his or her approval upon each original of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation and shall deliver the articles to the applicant. One original of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation bearing the approval in writing shall be filed with the director, or the director’s designee. Two (2) originals shall be filed with the secretary of state, who shall, upon payment to him or her of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), issue a certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation pursuant to §

7-1.2-1003

. Upon the issuance of the certificate or upon a later date, not more than thirty (30) days after the filing with the secretary of state of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation, that may be set forth in the plan, the merger or consolidation shall be effected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter with the effects set forth therein. At any time prior to the filing of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation with the secretary of state, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned pursuant to the provisions therefor, if any, set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

A merger or consolidation may be approved and effected pursuant to the provisions of this section, notwithstanding that the capital to liabilities ratio of the constituent banks exceeds the percentage of any of the other constituent banks, and no constituent bank having such excess of percentage shall be required to pay an extra dividend or make any distribution to its shareholders or depositors, nor shall any shareholder or depositor have any appraisal or dissenting right with respect to the merger or consolidation.

If the successor bank of a merger or consolidation is to be organized under laws other than the laws of this state, it shall file the following with the director, or the director’s designee, contemporaneously with the application for approval of the merger or consolidation:

An agreement that it may be served with process in this state in any proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation arising out of its business transacted in this state and any of its predecessor financial institutions; and

An irrevocable appointment of the director as its agent to accept service of process in any proceeding in the courts of this state or the courts of the United States situated in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 45; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 17; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 17.

19-7-5.
General effect of merger or consolidation.

Upon the merger or consolidation of a financial institution with one or more banks in accordance with the provisions of this chapter:

All of the property of each predecessor bank, including all its right, title, and interest in and to all assets of any conceivable value or benefit then existing, belonging or pertaining to it, shall immediately, by act of law and without conveyance or transfer, and without any further act or deed, be vested in and become that of the successor bank. The successor bank shall have, hold, and enjoy the right, privilege, interest, or asset in its own right as fully and to the same extent as when it was possessed, held, or enjoyed by the predecessor bank; and

The successor bank shall be deemed to be a continuation of the entity and identity of the predecessor bank, and all the rights, obligations, and relations of the predecessor bank to, or in respect to, any person, estate, creditor, depositor, trustee, or beneficiary of any trust and in respect to any executorship or trusteeship or trust or other fiduciary function, including appointments, designations, and nominations, shall remain unimpaired. The successor bank shall succeed to all rights, obligations, relations, and trusts including appointments, designations, and nominations, and the duties and liabilities connected the predecessor bank, and shall execute and perform each and every trust and relation in the same manner as if the successor bank had itself assumed the trust or relation, including the obligations and liabilities connected with the predecessor bank.

If the predecessor bank was acting as administrator, co-administrator, executor, co-executor, trustee, or co-trustee of, or in respect to, any estate or trust being administered under the laws of this state and, to the extent permitted by the laws of this state, the laws of any other state, such relations as well as any other similar fiduciary relations, and all rights, privileges, duties, and obligations connected with the predecessor bank, shall remain unimpaired and shall continue into and in the successor bank, irrespective of the date when any of these relations may have been created or established, irrespective of the date of any trust agreement relating thereto or the death of any testator or decedent whose estate is being administered.

Nothing done in connection with the merger or consolidation of the bank shall, in respect to any executorship, trusteeship, or similar fiduciary relation, be deemed to be or to effect, under the laws of this state, a renunciation of any letters of administration or letters testamentary pertaining to that relation, or a removal or resignation from any executorship or trusteeship, nor shall the act or any other thing done be deemed to be of the same effect as if the executor or trustee had died or otherwise become incompetent to act.

A pending action or other judicial proceeding to which any of the constituent banks is a party shall not be deemed to have abated or to have discontinued by reason of the merger or consolidation, but may be prosecuted to final judgment, order, or decree in the same manner as if the merger or consolidation had not occurred; or the successor bank may be substituted as a party to any action or proceeding to which the predecessor bank was a party, and any judgment, order, or decree may be rendered for or against the successor bank that might have been rendered for or against the predecessor bank if the merger or consolidation had not occurred.

After merger or consolidation, a foreclosure of a mortgage begun by any predecessor bank may be completed by the successor bank and publication begun by the predecessor bank may be continued in the name of the successor bank. Any certificate of possession, affidavit of sale, or foreclosure deed relative to the foreclosure shall be executed by the proper officers on behalf of whichever of the constituent banks actually took possession or made the sale, but any instrument executed on behalf of the successor bank shall recite that it is the successor of the predecessor bank that commenced the foreclosure.

A new name may be adopted as the name of the successor bank as part of the plan of merger or consolidation, and it shall, without further action, become the name of the successor bank upon the effective date of the merger or consolidation.

The offices and branches of any bank merged or consolidated under the provisions of this chapter may be maintained as branch offices of the successor bank with the written permission of, and under the conditions, if any, set forth by the director, or the director’s designee, whether or not the branch offices shall be in more than one state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 45; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 6.

19-7-6.
Interstate purchases of assets and assumptions of liabilities.

In addition to any other power granted under the laws of this state, a financial institution may, with the approval of the director, or the director’s designee, purchase all or part of the assets of, and assume all or part of the liabilities of, an out-of-state bank and operate any office or branch of the out-of-state bank acquired in connection with the out-of-state bank.

An out-of-state bank may, with the approval of the director, or the director’s designee, purchase substantially all of the assets and assume substantially all of the liabilities of a financial institution and operate any office or branch of the bank acquired in connection therewith; provided, however, that the law of the state in which the out-of-state bank has its principal office:

Permits such a purchase of assets, assumption of liabilities, and operation of offices and branches; and

Authorizes, under conditions not substantially more restrictive than those imposed by the laws of this state, as determined by the director, or the director’s designee, a financial institution to purchase assets, assume liabilities, and operate offices and branches in another state. No out-of-state bank shall apply to the director, or the director’s designee, for approval of such a purchase, assumption, and operation unless the purchase, assumption, and operation shall first be approved as follows:

With respect to financial institutions having capital stock, by the board of directors and shareholders pursuant to the applicable provisions of §

7-1.2-1102

, except that the purchase, assumption, and operation must receive the affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) or more of the shareholders entitled to vote thereon;

With respect to a mutual savings bank organized under this title, by a two thirds (2/3) vote of the board of trustees thereof and a majority vote of the depositors of the mutual savings bank present in person or by proxy, at a meeting called by the board of trustees; and

With respect to each such bank not organized under the laws of this state, in accordance with the applicable provisions imposed by the laws under which it is organized.

Upon the filing of an application to purchase assets and assume liabilities under this section, together with duplicate originals of the agreement of purchase and assumption entered into in connection therewith, the director, or the director’s designee, shall furnish the applicant a form of notice specifying the names of the purchasing financial institution and the selling financial institution and the location of the offices or branches to be acquired and assigning a date and place for public hearing on the application. The applicant shall publish the notice at least once a week, for three (3) successive weeks, in one or more newspapers designated by the director, or the director’s designee. Upon a finding that the public interest so requires, the director, or the director’s designee, may lessen the period and the manner prescribed for giving notice.

In determining whether to approve the application, the director, or the director’s designee, shall consider whether the purchase, assumption, and operation is consistent with the safety and soundness of, and the convenience and advantage of the communities served by, each financial institution that is a party to the agreement. The procedures for conducting hearings by the director, or the director’s designee, and the rights of appeal from decisions of the director, or the director’s designee, shall be governed by the applicable provisions of this title. If the director, or the director’s designee, approves the application, he or she shall endorse his or her approval upon each original of the agreement of purchase and assumption and shall deliver the agreement to the applicant. One original of the agreement bearing the director’s, or the director’s designee’s, approval in writing shall be filed with the director, or the director’s designee, and the other shall be retained by the applicant as evidence of the approval. The applicant shall cause notice of any abandonment of a transaction approved pursuant to this subsection to be filed with the director, or the director’s designee, and in the event of such abandonment, any approval granted hereunder shall be null and void.

A shareholder of a selling financial institution shall have the right to dissent from the corporate action involved in accordance with the provisions of §

7-1.2-1201

and on the terms and conditions set forth in §

7-1.2-1202

. No shareholder or depositor of a financial institution without capital stock that is a party to an agreement of purchase and assumption shall have any appraisal or dissenting right with respect to this corporate action.

An out-of-state bank that is to be the purchasing bank shall file the following with the director, or the director’s designee, contemporaneously with the filing of any application for approval under this section:

An agreement that it may be served with process in this state in any proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation arising out of its business transacted in this state and any obligation assumed by it; and

An irrevocable appointment of the director as its agent to accept service of process in any proceeding in the courts of this state or the courts of the United States situated in this state.

The offices or branches acquired pursuant to an agreement of purchase and assumption approved by the director, or the director’s designee, may be operated as branch offices of the purchasing bank with the written permission of, and under conditions, if any, approved by the director, or the director’s designee, whether or not the branch offices shall be in more than one state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 45; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 17; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 17.

19-7-7.
Powers authorized.

If organized under laws other than the laws of this state, a successor bank or purchasing bank shall have and may exercise within this state the powers and privileges granted to financial institutions. A successor financial institution or purchasing financial institution shall have and may exercise in this state the powers and privileges granted to it under the laws of this state, and, in any state under the laws of which one or more of its predecessor banks was organized or in which it operates a branch, the powers and privileges granted to it under the laws of that state or states.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 45.

19-7-8.
Special definitions applicable to mergers, etc.

For purposes of this chapter:

The surviving or new bank resulting from a merger or consolidation, as the case may be, shall be called the “successor financial institution” or “successor bank”, as applicable;

Each bank discontinuing its corporate existence pursuant to a merger or consolidation shall be called a “predecessor financial institution” or “predecessor bank”, as applicable;

The bank purchasing assets and assuming liabilities and acquiring offices and branches under an agreement of purchase and assumption shall be called the “purchasing financial institution” or “purchasing bank”, as applicable;

The bank selling assets and permitting its liabilities to be assumed and transferring branches and offices under an agreement shall be called the “selling financial institution” or “selling bank”, as applicable;

References to “articles of incorporation” in chapter 1.2 of title 7 shall be deemed to refer to the agreement to form, charter, or the articles or agreement of association of each bank or financial institution involved, as from time to time amended, however it may be described by the law under which the institution is organized and whether or not it shall have been created by any special act of incorporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 45; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 17; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 17.

19-7-9.
Interstate branches.

Upon obtaining the consent of the director, or the director’s designee, a financial institution may establish a branch, or branches, outside of this state and an out-of-state bank may establish a branch, or branches, within this state; provided that, in the case of an out-of-state bank, the law of the state in which it is principally located authorizes under conditions not substantially more restrictive than those imposed by the laws of this state, as determined by the director, or the director’s designee, a financial institution to establish a branch in that state. The director, or the director’s designee, shall approve an application for a branch if the applicant has satisfied the standards and followed the procedures set forth for the establishment of branches for financial institutions in addition to the requirements of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 45.

19-7-10.
Federally chartered institutions.

To the extent it is empowered to do so, this state authorizes banks organized under the laws of the United States that have a main office in Rhode Island to merge or consolidate with and to acquire assets and assume liabilities of out-of-state banks and to have assets and liabilities assumed by out-of-state banks.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 45.

19-7-11.
Examination of mergers and acquisitions.

The director, or the director’s designee, may make or cause to be made an examination of each bank in order to fulfill the requirements of this chapter. The total cost of these examinations shall be borne by the bank so examined and shall be governed by the same terms and conditions as the examinations of regulated institutions. In lieu of this examination, the director, or the director’s designee, may accept the report of an examination made by the equivalent supervisory official of another state, pursuant to the laws of that state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 45.

19-7-12.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 45.